Arkansas statutes. Title 12 Law Enforcement, Emergency Management, and Military Affairs
Chapter 27

Division of Correction — Division of Community Correction

12-27-120. Retirement of employees.

12-27-142. Medical services contract.

Subchapter 1

— General Provisions

12-28-101. Facilities.

The division shall also provide education and other rehabilitation and treatment programs designed to prepare inmates committed to the division for productive and law-abiding lives upon release from the division.

The division may contract with state or private entities such as accredited colleges or universities to provide additional educational opportunities for inmates under the direction and authority of the board and the Corrections School System.

History.

Acts 1977, No. 466, § 4; A.S.A. 1947, § 46-100.1; Acts 2001, No. 613, § 1; 2009, No. 788, §
2; 2019, No. 910, § 775.

12-28-102. Death chamber.

History.

Acts 1968 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 50, § 16; A.S.A. 1947, § 46-115.

12-28-103. Cost impact statements.

Bills that affect inmate population patterns at facilities of the Department of Correction by imposing restrictions on inmate release or by increased intake into the department of inmates based on felony convictions; and

Bills that affect programs or services of the department.

The Director of the Department of Correction who shall either personally prepare or cause appropriate officials of the department to prepare, a cost impact statement to be approved by the director before submission to the house in which the request was made; or

Any other state agency that has information available upon which to base a cost impact statement.

History.

Acts 1997, No. 423, § 1.

12-28-104. Paroling authority.

The Parole Board shall be the paroling authority for the units of the Department of Corrections and shall make recommendations to the Governor in cases from the criminal courts that, in the board's opinion, the defendant in the case should be pardoned.

The board shall consider the work skills, education, rehabilitation, and treatment programs recommended to the inmate upon intake and determine whether the inmate took advantage of those opportunities while incarcerated in the department in making decisions regarding parole.

History.

Acts 1969, No. 377, § 9; 1981, No. 107, § 2; A.S.A. 1947, § 46-916; Acts 2009, No. 788, § 3; 2019, No. 910, § 776.

12-28-105. Continuity of care for persons released.

(1)Any person incarcerated by the Division of Correction may be permitted to remain within a treatment facility operated by the division, if serious physical or mental disorders or disabilities exist, until release to a similar treatment setting outside of the division can be accomplished.

In no case should the continuation of housing extend beyond a seventy-two-hour period.

The division will adopt rules to govern the housing situations.

History.

Acts 1993, No. 1281, §§ 1-3; 2019, No. 910, § 777.

12-28-106. Electric fencing.

(1)The Division of Correction may design and install high-voltage electrified security fence systems at all existing and proposed medium and maximum security prisons.

However, at the time of installation there shall be posted universal danger signs on all sides of the system clearly visible to inmates and the public displaying in English and Spanish the warning “deadly voltage”.

The installation of these fence systems shall be double, twelve-feet-high, security perimeter fences, with the exception of those locations where a building or wall constitutes a part of the security perimeter.

At institutions where these fences have been installed, the division shall provide perimeter patrol for the safety of the local community.

History.

Acts 1997, No. 350, § 1; 2019, No. 910, § 778.

12-28-107. Training for inmates.

As provided for in §12-28-101, the Division of Correction shall provide education as well as training for inmates who want to acquire skills for employment upon release.

(1)The division shall identify high-demand vocations and careers and shall accordingly create training and skills programs to prepare inmates for gainful employment upon release.

The programs under this section shall be available to all inmates except for inmates who disqualify themselves from participation due to disciplinary violations or because of other circumstances that may preclude the inmates' access to these programs.

Programs under this section shall include without limitation training in the following fields:

Professional careers and vocations;

Service careers and vocations;

Information and computer technology;

Medical technology; and

Office administration.

History.

Acts 2011, No. 1151, § 3; 2019, No. 910, §§ 779, 780.

Subchapter 2

— Cummins Unit

12-28-201. [Repealed.]

12-28-301, 12-28-302. [Repealed.]

12-28-401 — 12-28-408. [Repealed.]

12-28-501 — 12-28-507. [Repealed.]

12-28-601. Title.

This subchapter shall be known as the “Prison Overcrowding Emergency Powers Act”.

History.

Acts 1987, No. 418, § 1.

12-28-602. Definitions.

As used in this subchapter:

“Board” means the Board of Corrections;

“County backlog” means those inmates sentenced to the Division of Correction who are being housed in the county jails until space is available in a prison;

“Prison” means a correctional facility operated by the division under the supervision and direction of the board;

“Prison system” means the prison facilities of the division; and

“Rated capacity” means the actual available bed space in the prison system as certified by the board, subject to applicable federal and state laws and the rules and regulations adopted pursuant to those laws.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment substituted “Division of Correction” for “Department of Correction” in (2); and substituted “division” for “department” in (3) and (4).

History.

Acts 1987, No. 418, § 2; 1995, No. 204, § 1; 1995, No. 293, § 1; 2003, No. 1721, § 1; 2019, No. 910, § 781.

12-28-603. Declaration of emergency.

Whenever the population of the prison system exceeds ninety-eight percent (98%) of the rated capacity for thirty (30) consecutive days, or whenever the number of inmates on the county jail backlog exceeds five hundred (500) inmates, the Board of Corrections may declare a prison overcrowding state of emergency.

In making any emergency request based on exceeding the ninety-eight-percent capacity, the board shall certify the rated capacity and current population of the prison system and shall further certify that all authorized actions consistent with applicable state laws and rules have been exhausted in an attempt to reduce the prison population to ninety-eight percent (98%) of the rated capacity.

In making any emergency request based on a county jail backlog exceeding five hundred (500) inmates, the board shall certify the list of persons on the county jail backlog and shall further certify that all authorized actions consistent with applicable state laws and rules have been exhausted in an attempt to reduce the county jail backlog to five hundred (500) inmates.

Provided all other requirements of this subchapter are met, the board is authorized to invoke this subchapter separately for those facilities housing either male or female inmate populations.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment substituted “rules” for “regulations” in (a)(2) and (a)(3).

Amendments. The 2019 amendment substituted “Division of Correction” for “Department of Correction” in (a)(1); and substituted “division” for “department” in (b)(1).

Cross References. Custody classifications and treatment programs, §12-29-101.

Cited: Loveless v. Agee, 2010 Ark. 53 (2010).

History.

Acts 1987, No. 418, § 3; 1991, No. 684, § 1; 1995, No. 204, § 2; 1995, No. 293, § 2; 2003, No. 1721, § 2; 2019, No. 315, §
890.

12-28-604. List of inmates — Early parole or discharge.

(1)When the Board of Corrections declares a prison overcrowding state of emergency due to exceeding ninety-eight percent (98%) of the rated capacity and notifies the Director of the Division of Correction of the emergency as authorized, the director shall certify to the board a list of those inmates who are Class I and Class II, and the director shall indicate which inmates he or she recommends for parole, transfer, or discharge.

The listed inmates shall be those who, if authorized, would have their parole eligibility, transfer eligibility, or minimum release dates moved up to a point where they would immediately be eligible for parole, transfer, or discharge.

Upon receipt of the list of inmates certified by the director, the board is authorized to move up the projected parole eligibility, transfer eligibility, or minimum release dates of any or all inmates on the list by up to ninety (90) days.

The board shall certify to the director a list of the names of all prisoners whose projected parole eligibility, transfer eligibility, or minimum release dates are affected pursuant to the provisions of this subchapter.

(1)When the board declares a prison overcrowding state of emergency due to the county jail backlog exceeding five hundred (500) inmates and notifies the director of the emergency as authorized, the director shall certify to the board a list of those inmates who are in Class I or Class II status who have been incarcerated in a division facility for a minimum of six (6) months and are serving a sentence for a nonviolent offense as established by the board, and the director shall indicate which inmates he or she recommends for parole, transfer, or discharge.

The listed inmates shall be those who, if authorized, would have their parole eligibility, transfer eligibility, or discharge dates moved up to a point where they would immediately be eligible for parole, transfer, or discharge.

Upon the receipt of the list of inmates certified by the director, the board is authorized to move up the projected parole eligibility, transfer eligibility, or discharge dates of any or all inmates on the list by up to one (1) year.

The board shall certify to the director a list of the names of all prisoners whose projected parole eligibility, transfer eligibility, or discharge dates are affected pursuant to the provisions of this subchapter.

History.

Acts 1987, No. 418, § 4; 1995, No. 204, § 3; 1995, No. 293, § 3; 2003, No. 1721, § 3; 2019, No. 910, §§ 782, 783.

12-28-605. Successive states of emergency.

The Board of Corrections may declare succeeding prison overcrowding states of emergency at any time when the prison population exceeds ninety-eight percent (98%) of the rated capacity of the prison system, but these successive states of emergency shall not be declared more often than one (1) time each ninety (90) days or at any time the county jail backlog exceeds five hundred (500) inmates.

Any subsequent state of emergency declared pursuant to the provisions of this subchapter shall have the same effect as the first declaration of emergency with respect to inmates in the prison system on the date of the declaration of each successive state of emergency.

History.

Acts 1987, No. 418, § 5; 1995, No. 204, § 4; 1995, No. 293, § 4; 2003, No. 1721, § 4.

12-28-606. Declaration of end of emergency.

At any time during a declared prison overcrowding state of emergency, the Board of Corrections may declare the prison overcrowding state of emergency to be ended.

History.

Acts 1987, No. 418, § 6; 1995, No. 204, § 5; 1995, No. 293, § 5.

Subchapter 7

— Arkansas Boot Camp Act

Effective Dates. Acts 2019, No. 910, § 6346(b): July 1, 2019. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act revises the duties of certain state entities; that this act establishes new departments of the state; that these revisions impact the expenses and operations of state government; and that the sections of this act other than the two uncodified sections of this act preceding the emergency clause titled ‘Funding and classification of cabinet-level department secretaries’ and ‘Transformation and Efficiencies Act transition team’ should become effective at the beginning of the fiscal year to allow for implementation of the new provisions at the beginning of the fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and Sections 1 through 6343 of this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2019”.

12-28-701. Title.

This subchapter shall be referred to and may be cited as the “Arkansas Boot Camp Act”.

History.

Acts 1989, No. 492, § 1.

12-28-702. Legislative findings and determinations.

The General Assembly finds that:

The cost of incarcerating the expanding number of offenders in conventional penitentiaries is skyrocketing, bringing added fiscal pressures on the state;

Some inmates may be effectively punished in a more affordable manner through the exposure to severe, military-like conditions; and

The Division of Correction should be given the authority to establish boot camps which will provide a more affordable means of punishing certain inmates who are designated as eligible for this alternative punishment by the division.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment, in (3), substituted “Division of Correction” for “Department of Correction” and“division” for “department”.

History.

Acts 1989, No. 492, § 2; 2019, No. 910, § 784.

12-28-703. Authorization.

The Board of Corrections shall develop and implement a boot camp program designed to reduce the inmate population by diverting eligible offenders from long-term incarceration.

This diversion shall involve successful completion of, at a minimum, a sixty-day program of intensive behavior modification in an arduous, physically demanding, military-like environment, otherwise known as a “boot camp”.

History.

Acts 1989, No. 492, § 3; 1993, No. 582, § 1.

12-28-704. Eligibility.

Appropriate inmates shall be chosen for the boot camp program established by this subchapter in accordance with guidelines to be adopted by the Board of Corrections. These guidelines must include a risk profile system to be used in selecting inmates eligible for assignment to the program.

History.

Acts 1989, No. 492, § 4.

12-28-705. Construction — Applicability of other acts.

This subchapter shall be liberally construed to accomplish the intent and purposes of the General Assembly in adopting it and shall be the sole authority required for the accomplishment of these purposes. To this end, it shall not be necessary to comply with general provisions of other laws dealing with the minimum time constraints as applied to release eligibility.

History.

Acts 1989, No. 492, § 5.

12-27-139. Notice to police when furloughed inmate will be in jurisdiction.